California, session 20252026, SB1103.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the REPAIR ACT of 2026.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Widespread federal immigration raids are taking place throughout California. Common raid tactics, including the use of masks and unmarked cars by armed, plainclothes officers; the use of ruses to lure individuals out of, or gain access to, private spaces for questioning and detention; and the use of racial profiling to target individuals for questioning and detention are spreading fear and creating a sense of chaos among the general public.(b) Misinformation about the raids is rampant. It is difficult for the public to know what is true and this confusion exacerbates the fear and chaos caused by the raids, leading to panic that is detrimental to public safety and public health.(c)Large home improvement retailers have emerged as focal points for these raids. Federal immigration authorities are concentrating immigration enforcement activities at these retailers to the point that raids at large home improvement retailers are a daily occurrence.(c) Large retail stores have become locations where federal immigration enforcement activities have occurred throughout California.(d) California residents, contractors, homeowners, and day laborers rely on large home improvement retailers retail stores to purchase supplies for their homes and businesses, contract laborers to assist with home improvements, construction, and other projects, and find work to goods, obtain services, conduct business, and support themselves and their families. The ability to continue to do so safely is under threat due to the concentration of federal immigration raids at these retailers. Federal immigration raids at or adjacent to these large retail stores may disrupt access to employment, commerce, essential goods and services, and undermine public safety.(e) This act seeks to preserve the ability of California residents, workers, customers, contractors, homeowners, and day laborers to safely patronize large home improvement retailers retail stores by reducing misinformation and panic promoting transparency regarding retailer policies associated with federal immigration raids, and ensuring that the Attorney General and designated county agencies have timely access to documentation related to federal immigration enforcement activity, thereby supporting public safety and public health, promoting transparency, and ensuring corporate responsibility.SEC. 3. Section 1714.42 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1714.42. (a) (1) A large home improvement retailer retail store doing business in this state shall, at a minimum, do both of the following in relation to immigration enforcement activity occurring on their premises:(A) Provide the Attorney General with copies of any video footage, photographs, written reports, and any other documentation of immigration enforcement activity gathered in the normal course of business within 14 calendar days of receipt of an administrative subpoena issued by the Attorney General.(B)Compile and disclose on the large home improvement retailer’s internet website a daily record of any immigration enforcement activity occurring on its premises, including both of the following:(i)The date, time, and specific store at which immigration enforcement activity occurred.(ii)A description of the immigration enforcement activity, which may include the law enforcement agencies involved, the number of law enforcement officers and law enforcement vehicles present, the number of individuals subject to search, detention, and arrest, whether weapons of any kind were drawn, including guns, and whether any injuries occurred.(B) Provide the county in which the immigration enforcement activity occurred with access to any video footage, photographs, written reports, and any other documentation of immigration enforcement activity gathered in the normal course of business within a reasonable period of time after receipt of a written request issued by the county.(2) The large home improvement retailer retail store shall disclose on their internet website any policies and practices the large home improvement retailer retail store maintains that relate to immigration enforcement activity on its premises, including both of the following:(A) Whether the large home improvement retailer retail store maintains policies regarding interaction between its employees or agents and federal immigration authorities.(B) Whether the large home improvement retailer retail store provides surveillance data, directly or indirectly, to federal immigration authorities or any agency that provides that data to federal immigration authorities.(3) Information disclosed on the large home improvement retailer’s retail store’s internet website pursuant to this subdivision shall be made available via a conspicuous link on the internet website’s home page.(b) (1) A large home improvement retailer retail store shall preserve all documentation described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). (a) for no less than 60 days.(2) Any documentation submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be considered a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(c) Every county board of supervisors shall select that appropriate agency in the county to have the authority to access information on federal immigration enforcement activities at large retail stores located in that county.(c)(d) The Attorney General or a county counsel may bring an action for injunctive relief for a violation of this section.(d)(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Doing business in this state” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 23101 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(2) “Immigration enforcement activity” means any surveillance, consensual or nonconsensual stop, detention, search, arrest, or use of force by an immigration enforcement authority conducted wholly or in part for the purposes of enforcing federal immigration law.(3) “Immigration enforcement authority” means officers or agents of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or the United States Customs and Border Protection.(4) “Large home improvement retailer” retail store” means a business entity that operates 50 or more retail stores in the state with an average size of 100,000 square feet or more of enclosed space that sells a large variety of goods, including, but not limited to, hardware, lumber, plumbing supplies, electrical fixtures and supplies, windows, doors, plants, and similar items used in the maintenance, improvement, or expansion of dwellings, buildings, or sites. space.(5) “Premises” means both enclosed and outside space occupied by a large home improvement retailer retail store and includes the parking lot of a large home improvement retailer retail store and any public walkways directly adjacent to the parking lot. building.(6) “Surveillance data” includes, but is not limited to, data collected by automated license plate reader systems and artificial intelligence-driven analytics.(e)(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.(f)(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that preserving the ability of California residents, contractors, homeowners, and day laborers to safely patronize large home improvement retailers retail stores is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 3 of this act adding Section 1714.42 to the Civil Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 5. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 3 of this act, which adds Section 1714.42 to the Civil Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:Documentation of immigration enforcement activity submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to this act may contain sensitive personal information regarding workers, customers, and other individuals present at the time of enforcement activity, as well as information the disclosure of which could compromise the integrity of ongoing investigations. In order to protect the privacy of individuals depicted in or identified by those records, to preserve the integrity of investigations conducted pursuant to this act, and to prevent the disclosure of investigatory records in a manner that would undermine the Attorney General’s ability to enforce this act, it is necessary that the act limits the public’s right of access to records submitted to the Attorney General pursuant to this act.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.